Arkansas statutes. Constitution Of The State Of Arkansas Of 1874
AMEND. 2.
REGULATION OF CARRIERS (CONST., ART. 17, § 10 AMENDED).

Publisher's Notes.

This amendment amended Ark. Const., Art. 17, § 10, and is incorporated therein. The amendment was proposed by the General Assembly at the 1897 regular session (see Acts 1897, p. 92), declared to be adopted by the Speaker of the House on January 13, 1899, and so proclaimed by the Governor. The vote for the amendment was 63,703 and the vote against was 16,940.